New York, session 2025-2026, S1687.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 8-100 of the 2 election law, as amended by chapter 5 of the laws of 2019, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (a) A primary election shall be held on the fourth Tuesday in June 5 before every general election unless otherwise changed by an act of the 6 legislature. Members of the state and county committees and assembly 7 district leaders and associate district leaders and all other party 8 positions to be elected shall be elected at such primary and all nomi- 9 nations for public office required to be made at a primary election in 10 such year shall be made at such primary. In each year in which electors 11 of president and vice president of the United States are to be elected 12 an additional primary election[, to be known as the spring primary,] 13 shall also be held on the [first] fourth Tuesday in [February] June 14 unless otherwise changed by an act of the legislature, for the purpose 15 of electing delegates to the national convention. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03982-01-5